Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.050

Licenses—Fees.

(1) The secretary shall furnish a license upon the authority of the board to any person who applies and who has qualified under the provisions of this chapter. At the time of applying, the applicant shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees established pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. No person registered or licensed on July 24, 1983, as a physical therapist shall be required to pay an additional fee for a license under this chapter.

(2) No fees collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be used to meet the state's monetary obligations as a member state to the physical therapy licensure compact.

[ 2017 c 108 s 4; 1996 c 191 s 59; 1991 c 3 s 178; 1985 c 7 s 63; 1983 c 116 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 65; 1961 c 64 s 4; 1949 c 239 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-5.]